West Virginia, session 2025, HB3019.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF COMMUNICABLE AND OTHER INFECTIOUS DISEASES. §16-3-4d. School related immunization notification requirement. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that the concept of informed consent is a bedrock principle of our republic related to personal autonomy and agency, and that this authority naturally extends to children in the custody of their parents and/or legal guardians. (b) Enactment. – Parental notification shall be required by public school districts in this state any time that school-related immunization notifications or letters are sent to parents. The informational items set forth in subsection (c) of this section shall be sent to any prospective public-school enrollees prior to signing enrollment papers. The informational items shall be sent to currently enrolled student households no less than annually.(c) Items to be included. – The parental notification shall include the following information:(1) FDA Patient Package Insert information for each school-related immunization; and(2) Information about the National Vaccine Injury Compensation Program, including information housed on the website at https://www.hrsa.gov/vaccine-compensation.(d) Provisions of this section shall be effective from passage.